Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.460

Fireworks and explosives.

(1) All records obtained and all reports produced as required by state fireworks law, chapter 70.77 RCW, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

(2) All records obtained and all reports submitted as required by the Washington state explosives act, chapter 70.74 RCW, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to restrict access to information related to the regulatory duties or actions of any agency.

[ 2019 c 125 s 1; 2005 c 274 s 426.]